Utah statutes.
32A-11a-110 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Judicial remedies.
(1)  A supplier or wholesaler who is a party to a distributorship agreement
may maintain a civil action against the supplier or wholesaler in a court of
competent jurisdiction in the county  in which the wholesaler's principal
place of business is located if:
(a)  the supplier or wholesaler violates this chapter; or
(b) (i)  the supplier and wholesaler are not able to mutually agree on
reasonable compensation under Section 32A-11a-108; and
(ii)  the parties do not agree to submit the matter to arbitration in
accordance with Section 32A-11a-108 prior to or within 20 days following
service of process on the electing party in the civil action.
(2) (a)  The prevailing party in any action under Subsection (1) shall
recover:
(i)  actual damages, including the value of the wholesaler's business as
specified in Section 32A-11a-108 if applicable; and
(ii)  reasonable attorneys' fees and court costs.
(b)  In addition to the amount awarded under Subsection (2)(a), the court may
grant such relief in law or equity as the court determines to be necessary or
appropriate considering the purposes of this chapter.
(3)  If either party elects arbitration under Subsection (1)(b)(ii) following
service of process, the civil action is stayed pending a decision by the
arbitration panel.
